Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Unaccompanied homeless youth services enhancement grant program. (1)
As used in this section, “unaccompanied homeless youth” means a person who is at least  14
years of age but  not more than 24 years of age, who is not in the physical custody of a parent
or legal guardian and who is homeless.
(2) In addition to any other scholarships or grants, the  Department of Human Services
may award two-year grants to organizations that provide  services to unaccompanied
homeless youth.
(3) An organization is eligible to apply for a grant under this  section if the organization
has an existing grant with the department to  provide services to unaccompanied homeless
youth.
(4) Grants awarded under this section may be used for any of the following:
(a) To increase the accessibility of any of the  following programs and services to unac-
companied homeless youth:
(A) Shelter facilities;
(B) Outreach;
(C) Culturally specific services; and
(D) Mental health or substance abuse services; and
(b) To create or strengthen  partnerships with host home programs and other transitional
housing options.
(5) The department may adopt rules to administer the grant program  described in this
section.
SECTION 2.
Host home projects. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Host home project” means a  project that facilitates an arrangement under which an
unaccompanied homeless youth resides in the home of a private individual, pursuant to the
terms of a contract between the private individual and the youth, for free or at below-market
rent.
Enrolled House Bill 2544 (HB 2544-B) Page 1
(b) “Long-term host home  project” means a host home project run by an organization
that has a memorandum of understanding or a letter of agreement with one or more  school
districts and in which unaccompanied homeless youth participants,  on average during the
most recent two years, resided in host  homes for a minimum of 180 days, as reported by the
relevant school district.
(c) “Short-term host home  project” means a host home project in which unaccompanied
homeless youth participants, on  average during the most recent two years, resided in host
homes for a maximum of 180 days, as reported by the relevant school district.
(d) “Unaccompanied homeless youth” means a person who is:
(A) At least 16 years of age but not more than 21 years of age;
(B) Not in the physical custody of a parent or legal guardian;
(C) Not in the custody of the Department of Human Services;
(D) Not a ward of the state; and
(E) Homeless.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other scholarships or grants, the department
may award two-year grants to organizations that operate  host home projects for unaccom-
panied homeless youth.
(3) An organization is eligible to apply for a grant under this  section if the organization
operated a host home project on January 1, 2021, and can demonstrate the ability to:
(a) Expand host home  projects in communities in which the organization provides ser-
vices;
(b) Establish new long-term  host home projects in communities that do not have long-
term host home projects; or
(c) Establish new short-term host home projects.
(4) Recipients of grants awarded under this section shall work to achieve  the following
outcomes for unaccompanied homeless youth:
(a) Improved school attendance.
(b) Participation in formal or informal mentoring.
(c) Increased access to nutrition, health care, mental trauma-informed support  and
transportation services.
(5) A recipient of a grant awarded under this section shall ensure all individuals of 18
years of age or older residing in the host home who are not  the unaccompanied homeless
youth have an approved background check under ORS 181A.200 and 409.027.
(6) A host home is not a child-caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205.
(7) The department may adopt rules to administer the grant program  described in this
section.
SECTION 3.
Report. The Department of  Human Services shall submit annual reports on
the host home project grant program under section 2 of this 2021 Act to committees or  in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating  to housing, homeless youth services
and high school education. The reports must include information about the  effectiveness of
the projects, including:
(1) A description of the  process used to identify and reach out to unaccompanied
homeless youth;
(2) Assessment data and other indicators to determine how well the  housing, health and
academic needs of unaccompanied homeless youth are being met;
(3) Demographic information about youth served or assessed for program participation;
(4) The academic progress of students participating in host home projects; and
(5) Assessment by the youth, host families and partner  government and nonprofit enti-
ties about their experience in the host home projects.
SECTION 4.
Appropriations. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General
Fund appropriation made to the Department of Human Services by section 1 (3),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
Enrolled House Bill 2544 (HB 2544-B) Page 2
self-sufficiency programs,  is increased by $1,800,000, for the purpose of carrying out section
1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department  of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5529),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for self-sufficiency programs, is
increased by $1,800,000, for the purpose of carrying out sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. Reports due. The report described in  section 3 of this 2021 Act is first due
no later than September 15, 2022, and the 15th day of each September thereafter.
SECTION 6. Sunset date.  (1) Sections  1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on June 30,
2023.
(2) Sections 3 and 5 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 7.
Captions. The section captions used  in this 2021 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law  of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. Effective date. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on
which the 2021 regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2544 (HB 2544-B) Page 3